District of Columbia statutes.
22-2301

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Aggressive manner” means:

(A)

Approaching, speaking to, or following a person in a manner as would cause a reasonable person to fear bodily harm or the commission of a criminal act upon the person, or upon property in the person’s immediate possession;

(B)

Touching another person without that person’s consent in the course of asking for alms;

(C)

Continuously asking, begging, or soliciting alms from a person after the person has made a negative response; or

(D)

Intentionally blocking or interfering with the safe or free passage of a person by any means, including unreasonably causing a person to take evasive action to avoid physical contact.

(2)

“Ask, beg, or solicit alms” includes the spoken, written, or printed word or such other act conducted for the purpose of obtaining an immediate donation of money or thing of value.

Nov. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 10-54, § 2, 40 DCR 5450
1981 Ed., § 22-3311.